Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5003
Tax Equalization and Review Commission; created; commissioners; term.

(1) The Tax Equalization and Review Commission is created. The Tax Commissioner has no supervision, authority, or control over the actions or decisions of the commission relating to its duties prescribed by law. Beginning July 1, 2023, the commission shall have four commissioners, one commissioner from each congressional district and one at-large commissioner, with terms as provided in subsection (2) of this section. All commissioners shall be appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the members of the Legislature.

(2) The term of the commissioner from district 1 expires January 1, 2028, the term of the commissioner from district 2 expires January 1, 2024, the term of the commissioner from district 3 expires January 1, 2026, and the term of the at-large commissioner expires January 1, 2028. After the terms of the commissioners are completed as provided in this subsection, each subsequent term shall be for six years beginning and ending on January 1 of the applicable year. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of his or her term of office, a commissioner shall continue to serve until his or her successor has been appointed.

(3) The commission shall designate pursuant to rule and regulation its chairperson and vice-chairperson on a two-year, rotating basis.

(4) A commissioner may be removed by the Governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty or other cause after notice and a public hearing unless notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing by the commissioner.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 465, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 291, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB167, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 21;

Laws 2023, LB243, § 14.